Hawaii statutes.
§334-123 Initiation of proceeding for
assisted community treatment. [Repeal and reenactment on July 1, 2020.
L 2013, c 221, §24.] (a) Any interested party may file a petition with
the family court alleging that another person meets the criteria for assisted
community treatment. The petition shall state:

(1) Each of the criteria numbered (1) through (7) for
assisted community treatment, as set out in section 334-121;

(2) Petitioner's good faith belief that the subject
of the petition meets each of the criteria numbered (1) through (7) set forth
in section 334-121;

(3) Facts which support petitioner's good faith
belief that the subject of the petition meets each of the criteria numbered (1)
through (7) set forth in section 334-121; and

(4) That the subject of the petition is present
within the county where the petition is filed.

The hearing on the petition need not be limited
to the facts stated in the petition. The petition shall be executed subject to
the penalties of perjury.

(b) The petition may be accompanied by a
certificate of a licensed psychiatrist who has examined the subject of the
petition within twenty calendar days prior to the filing of the petition. For
purposes of the petition, an examination shall be considered valid so long as the
licensed psychiatrist has obtained enough information from the subject of the
petition to reach a diagnosis of the subject of the petition, and to express a
professional opinion concerning the same, even if the subject of the petition
is not fully cooperative. [L 1984, c 251, pt of §1; am L 1986, c 339, §44; am L
2013, c 221, §9; am L 2015, c 231, §1]

Note

The 2015 amendment is exempt from the repeal and reenactment
condition of L 2013, c 221, §24. L 2015, c 231, §9.

L 2013, c 221, §21 and part of §24 provide:

"SECTION 21. (a) Any treating provider wishing to file
a petition pursuant to section 334-123, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for assisted
community treatment shall:

(1) Obtain
historical information related to MH-1s and hospitalization of persons who are
under an order to treat; and

(2) Track
further episodes of MH-1s and hospitalization while the persons are under the
order.

(b) An entity designated by the department of health shall
gather information from treating providers related to MH-1s and hospitalization
of persons who are under an order to treat and submit an annual report of its
findings and recommendations to the legislature no later than twenty days prior
to the convening of every regular session beginning with the regular session of
2015.

. . . .

SECTION 24. This Act shall take effect on January 1, 2014,
and shall be repealed on July 1, 2020; provided that:

(1) Petitions
filed pursuant to section 334-123, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for assisted
community treatment involving a designated mental health program that is a
state-operated provider shall not be filed until after July 1, 2015;

(2) Any
private provider wishing to file a petition pursuant to section 334-123, Hawaii
Revised Statutes, for assisted community treatment may do so after January 1,
2014, using its own resources, if the petitioner is to be the designated mental
health program; [and]

(3) Any
interested party wishing to file a petition pursuant to section 334-123, Hawaii
Revised Statutes, for assisted community treatment may do so after January 1,
2014, using the party's own resources, if the designated mental health
program is a private provider[.]"

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next